src/fst/morphology/stems/exceptions.lexc
!! Exceptions are quite strange word-forms. the ones that do not fit anywhere 
!! else. This file contains all enumerated word forms that cannot reasonably be
!! created from lexical data by regular inflection. Usually there should be next
!! to none exceptions, it's always better to have a paradigm that covers only
!! one or few words than an exception since these will not work nicely with e.g.
!! compounding scheme or possibly many end applications.

LEXICON EXCEPTIONS

! Adverbs?
ywa+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Msc+Loc:ywã # ;

! Plural work needed in nouns
atukyritxi+N+Msc+Pl:atukyrywakurinhi # "grandfather/avô"; !grandfather.in-PL-M-AFET
sytu+N+Fem+Pl+Nom:sytuwakuru # ; !N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_ne/0 
pupỹkary+N+Msc+Pl+Nom:pupỹkarywakury # ; !N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc
pupỹkary+N+Msc+Pl+Nom:pupỹkarynyry # ; ! united

kamỹyry+N+Msc+Pl+Nom:kamỹyrywakury # "Macaw clan" ; ! N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_ne/0 ;
pyra+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+PxSg1:nypyrawakury # ;
pathery+N+Msc+Pl+Nom:patherywakury # ;

! Interjections
ateeneka+v1+Interj:ateeneka # ;
ateeneka+v2+Interj:atheeneka # ;
amu+Interj:amu # ;

! Verbs
kama+V+Loc+ScPl3F:ukamaãne # ; !

!atuku
karywa+N+Msc+Sg+Nom:karywa # ; !



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
